Washington statutes.
RCW 18.71.083

Maintenance of certification.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the commission may not require a physician to participate in a maintenance of certification requirement as a condition of licensure or license renewal. The commission may allow a physician to fulfill license renewal requirements through satisfactory participation in a recognized maintenance of certification program.

(2) This section does not apply to board certification requirements or maintenance of certification requirements included in any of the following:

(a) A stipulation to informal disposition under RCW 18.130.172;

(b) An order issued to resolve a statement of charges under RCW 18.130.090;

(c) An order issued under RCW 18.130.160; or

(d) A reinstatement order issued under RCW 18.130.150.

[ 2018 c 211 s 2.]